apertium-rus-ukr.ukr.dix
<pardef n="став/ок__n_m_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>ок</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ок</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ка</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кові</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ком</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ків</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кам</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ках</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ками</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ок<s n="n"/><s n="m"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="стріч/ка__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>ка</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кою</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ко</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ок</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кам</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ках</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ками</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="судочинств/о__n_nt_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ом</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>о<s n="n"/><s n="nt"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="супереч/ка__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>ка</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ку</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ці</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кою</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ко</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ок</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>кам</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ках</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ками</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ки</l><r>ка<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="схем/а__n_f_nn">
  <e>       <p><l>а</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>у</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>і</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ою</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>о</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l></l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ам</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ах</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ами</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>и</l><r>а<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="nn"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ставок"><i>став</i><par n="став/ок__n_m_nn"/></e>
<e lm="стрічка"><i>стріч</i><par n="стріч/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="судочинство"><i>судочинств</i><par n="судочинств/о__n_nt_nn"/></e>
<e lm="суперечка"><i>супереч</i><par n="супереч/ка__n_f_nn"/></e>
<e lm="схема"><i>схем</i><par n="схем/а__n_f_nn"/></e>
